Arkansas, session 2025, HB1784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-10-1907 - 20-10-1909 are amended to read
as follows:
20-10-1907. Informal dispute resolution hearing — Conduct.
(a) Unless the long-term care facility chooses another order of
presentation of arguments:
(1)(A) The Department of Human Services shall present the
initial arguments at the hearing.
(B) Initial arguments shall be detailed and not limited to
a recitation of the statement of deficiencies; and
(2) After the Department of Human Services department completes
its arguments, the long-term care facility shall present its arguments.
(b)(1) As a matter of fairness to all parties, the impartial decision
maker shall determine in conjunction with all parties:
(A) The appropriate time needed for each presentation of
information and argument; and
(B) The sequence and appropriate time for each rebuttal
*JMB515*
04-03-2025 17:23:16 JMB515

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1784
argument.
(2) However, the impartial decision maker may grant each party
additional equal time for good cause as determined by the impartial decision
maker in conjunction with all parties.
(c)(1) Rules of evidence or procedure shall not apply except as
provided in this section.
(2) The impartial decision maker may:
(A) Accept any information that the impartial decision
maker deems material to the issue being presented; and
(B) Reject any information that the impartial decision
maker deems immaterial to the issue being presented.
(d)(1) The hearing may not be recorded.
(2) However In addition, the impartial decision maker may make
written or recorded notes of the arguments.
(e) Only employees Employees of the long-term care facility, attending
physicians, other medical care providers of residents of the long-term care
facility at the time of the deficiency, pharmacists providing medications to
residents of the long-term care facility at the time of the deficiency, and
any consultant pharmacists or nurse consultants utilized by the long-term
care facility, and or by the medical director of the long-term care facility
may appear or participate at the hearing for or on the behalf of the long-
term care facility.
(f) Only employees of the Department of Human Services department may
appear or participate at the hearing for or on behalf of the Department of
Human Services department.
(g) A party may be represented by an attorney.
(h) A person authorized under subsection (e) or subsection (f)
subsections (e)-(g) of this section to participate in the hearing may present
direct questions to an opposing participant during the rebuttal argument.
(h)(1) Within fourteen (14) days of a final decision concerning the
issues presented in the hearing and any related matters, the Department of
Health shall provide the parties with a report concerning the hearing, all
decisions made on the basis of the hearing, and any related matters.
(2) The report required under subdivision (h)(1) of this section
shall include without limitation:
(A) Information concerning any change to the disputed
04-03-2025 17:23:16 JMB515

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1784
deficiency; and
(B) A listing of each specific item of the deficiency and
all changes made to the deficiency.
(i)(1) The Department of Human Services shall compile and make
available to all long-term care facilities subject to this section a
quarterly report that shall include without limitation the number of informal
dispute resolutions during the previous quarter that were:
(A) Heard;
(B) Decided in favor of the state agency; and
(C) Decided in favor of the long-term care facility.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall review the reports
under subdivision (i)(1) of this section and shall:
(A) Determine what patterns of sustained and overturned
deficiencies exist; and
(B) Evaluate the training process to address the
identified patterns.
(j) A party shall not be represented by an attorney.

20-10-1908. Determination of impartial decision maker and Office of
Long-Term Care.
(a)(1) Upon the conclusion of all arguments by the parties, the The
impartial decision maker shall issue a written statement of findings that
shall be entitled “Determinations” no later than seven (7) calendar days
after the informal dispute resolution hearing.
(2) The statement shall include:
(A) A recitation of the deficiency tag numbers;
(B) A statement of whether a disputed deficiency should
remain, be removed, or be modified on the statement of deficiencies; and
(C) The facts and persuasive arguments that support the
impartial decision maker's finding for each deficiency tag number.
(b)(1) The determination of the impartial decision maker shall be
provided to the parties.
(2)(A) The Office of Long-Term Care shall review the
determination and shall issue a written document entitled “State Survey
Agency Determination” within seven (7) calendar days after the issuance of
the “Determinations” statement required under subsection (a) of this section.
04-03-2025 17:23:16 JMB515

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1784
(B) The state survey agency determination shall state:
(i) Whether, for each disputed deficiency mentioned
in the impartial decision maker's determination, the finding of the impartial
decision maker is accepted, rejected, or accepted as modified by the state
survey agency;
(ii) For each deficiency finding by the impartial
decision maker that the office does not accept the finding of the impartial
decision maker, a statement explaining the reasons that the finding was not
accepted along with the facts, circumstances, or reasons for not accepting
the finding; and
(iii) For each disputed deficiency finding of the
impartial decision maker that the office accepts the finding with
modification, a recitation of the modification and the reason or reasons for
the modification.
(c) A state survey agency determination is not subject to appeal,
reargument, or reconsideration.
(d) The office shall deliver a copy of the state survey agency
determination to the long-term care facility and to the impartial decision
maker.
(e)(1) In accordance with the state survey agency determination, the
office shall issue an amended statement of deficiencies if the state survey
agency determination results in modification to any deficiencies cited in the
original statement of deficiencies.
(2) If the office determines that amendments to the statement of
deficiencies should result in changes to the scope or severity assigned to
any deficiency, the amended statement of deficiencies shall reflect the
changes to the scope or severity of any cited deficiency.
(f) The amended statement of deficiencies shall be provided to the
long-term care facility.
(g) The “Determinations” statement required under subsection (a) of
this section and the “State Survey Agency Determination” document required
under subdivision (b)(2) of this section shall be provided to the long-term
care facility no later than ten (10) days before the deadline for the long-
term care facility to request a hearing before an administrative law judge of
the United States Department of Health and Human Services Departmental
Appeals Board, as outlined in the notice letter issued to the long-term care
04-03-2025 17:23:16 JMB515

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1784
facility by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services, after the survey
that is the basis for the informal dispute resolution hearing.
(h)(1) The Department of Human Services shall compile and make
available to all long-term care facilities subject to this section a
quarterly report that shall include without limitation and identify by
deficiency, scope, and severity rating the number of informal dispute
resolutions during the previous quarter that were:
(A) Heard;
(B) Decided in favor of the state agency; and
(C) Decided in favor of the long-term care facility.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall:
(A) Review the reports under subdivision (h)(1) of this
section;
(B) Determine what patterns of sustained and overturned
deficiencies exist; and
(C) Evaluate the training process to address the
identified patterns.
(3) The Department of Human Services shall use the result from
the report under subsection (h) of this section to evaluate employee
performance and to determine whether individuals or groups of employees need
remedial training.

20-10-1909. Matters not subject to informal dispute resolution.
(a)(1) The informal dispute resolution hearing is limited to
deficiencies cited on a statement of deficiencies.
(2) No other issues may be addressed at an informal dispute
resolution hearing, including, but not limited to:
(A) Scope and severity assessments of deficiencies unless
the scope and severity assessments allege substandard quality of care or
immediate jeopardy;
(B) Any remedies imposed;
(C) Any alleged failure of the survey team to comply with
a requirement of the survey process;
(D) Any alleged inconsistency of the survey team in citing
deficiencies among long-term care facilities; and
(E) Any alleged inadequacy or inaccuracy of the informal
04-03-2025 17:23:16 JMB515

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1784
dispute resolution process.
(b) If the impartial decision maker finds that matters not subject to
informal dispute resolution are presented, the impartial decision maker shall
strike all documentary evidence related to or presented for the purpose of
disputing the matter not subject to informal dispute resolution.
(c) The impartial decision maker may not include in the determination
any matter not subject to informal dispute resolution.

/s/Wardlaw



























04-03-2025 17:23:16 JMB515